Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-912
Limits on goods and services; considerations; procedure.

(1) The department may establish (a) premiums, copayments, and deductibles for goods and services provided under the medical assistance program, (b) limits on the amount, duration, and scope of goods and services that recipients may receive under the medical assistance program subject to subsection (5) of this section, and (c) requirements for recipients of medical assistance as a necessary condition for the continued receipt of such assistance, including, but not limited to, active participation in care coordination and appropriate disease management programs and activities.

(2) In establishing and limiting coverage for services under the medical assistance program, the department shall consider (a) the effect of such coverage and limitations on recipients of medical assistance and medical assistance expenditures, (b) the public policy in section 68-905, (c) the experience and outcomes of other states, (d) the nature and scope of benchmark or benchmark-equivalent health insurance coverage as recognized under federal law, and (e) other relevant factors as determined by the department.

(3) Coverage for mandatory and optional services and limitations on covered services as established by the department prior to July 1, 2006, shall remain in effect until revised, amended, repealed, or nullified pursuant to law. Any proposed reduction or expansion of services or limitation of covered services by the department under this section shall be subject to the review requirements of section 68-909.

(4) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, proposed rules and regulations under this section relating to the establishment of premiums, copayments, or deductibles for eligible recipients or limits on the amount, duration, or scope of covered services for eligible recipients shall not become effective until the conclusion of the earliest regular session of the Legislature in which there has been a reasonable opportunity for legislative consideration of such rules and regulations. This subsection does not apply to rules and regulations that are (a) required by federal or state law, (b) related to a waiver in which recipient participation is voluntary, or (c) proposed due to a loss of federal matching funds relating to a particular covered service or eligibility category. Legislative consideration includes, but is not limited to, the introduction of a legislative bill, a legislative resolution, or an amendment to pending legislation relating to such rules and regulations.

(5) Any limitation on the amount, duration, or scope of goods and services that recipients may receive under the medical assistance program shall give full and deliberate consideration to the role of home health services from private duty nurses in meeting the needs of a disabled family member or disabled person.

Laws 1993, LB 804, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 316;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 68-1019.01;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 12;

Laws 2012, LB1122, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 12.